Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.340

Licensure pending compliance with state building code, chapter 19.27 RCW—Consultation with local officials.

(1) Before requiring any alterations to a child care facility due to inconsistencies with requirements in chapter 19.27 RCW, the department shall:

(a) Consult with the city or county enforcement official; and

(b) Receive written verification from the city or county enforcement official that the alteration is required.

(2) The department's consultation with the city or county enforcement official is limited to licensed child care space.

(3) Unless there is imminent danger to children or staff, the department may not modify, suspend, or revoke a child care license or business activities while the department is waiting to:

(a) Consult with the city or county enforcement official under subsection (1)(a) of this section; or

(b) Receive written verification from the city or county enforcement official that the alteration is required under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "child care facility" means a family day care home, school-age care, outdoor nature-based child care, and child day care center.

[ 2021 c 304 s 16; 2014 c 9 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.308.]